Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1620
Contracts; letting of bids; notice.

All contracts for work to be done, the expense of which is more than five hundred dollars, shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, upon notice of not less than twenty days of the terms and conditions of the contract to be let. The board of trustees shall have power to reject any and all bids and readvertise for the letting of such work.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 20, p. 533.